es: Categoría de ingrediente: Aminoácidos; De origen animal; Antioxidantes; Ingredientes artificiales; Botánicos; De origen lácteo; Enzimas; Ácidos grasos; Fibra; Extractos de frutas; Hierbas; Minerales; Extractos de hongos; Ingredientes naturales; Ácidos grasos omega; Orgánico; De origen vegetal; Probióticos; Proteína; Sintético; Extractos vegetales; Vitaminas; Otros
vi: Danh mục nguyên liệu: Axit amin; Có nguồn gốc từ động vật; Chất chống oxy hóa; Thành phần nhân tạo; Thực vật học; Làm từ sữa; Enzim; Axit béo; Sợi; Chiết xuất trái cây; Thảo mộc; Khoáng chất; Chiết xuất nấm; Thành phần tự nhiên; Axit béo omega; Hữu cơ; Thịt chay; Men vi sinh; Protein; Tổng hợp; Chiết xuất thực vật; Vitamin; Khác
cs: Kategorie ingrediencí: Aminokyseliny; Živočišného původu; Antioxidanty; Umělé přísady; Botanika; Na bázi mléka; Enzymy; Mastné kyseliny; Vlákno; Ovocné extrakty; Byliny; Minerály; Výtažky z hub; Přírodní složky; Omega mastné kyseliny; Organické; Na rostlinné bázi; Probiotika; Protein; Syntetické; Rostlinné extrakty; Vitamíny; Jiné
en: Ingredient category: Amino acids; Animal-derived; Antioxidants; Artificial ingredients; Botanicals; Dairy-based; Enzymes; Fatty acids; Fiber; Fruit extracts; Herbs; Minerals; Mushroom extracts; Natural ingredients; Omega fatty acids; Organic; Plant-based; Probiotics; Protein; Synthetic; Vegetable extracts; Vitamins; Other
nb: Ingredienskategori: Aminosyrer; Dyreavledet; Antioksidanter; Kunstige ingredienser; Botaniske stoffer; Meieribasert; Enzymer; Fettsyrer; Fiber; Fruktekstrakter; Urter; Mineraler; Soppekstrakter; Naturlige ingredienser; Omegafettsyrer; Økologisk; Plantebasert; Probiotika; Protein; Syntetisk; Grønnsaksekstrakter; Vitaminer; Annen
ro-RO: Categorie ingrediente: Aminoacizi; De origine animală; Antioxidanți; Ingrediente artificiale; Substanțe din plante; Pe bază de lapte; Enzime; Acizi grași; Fibre; Extracte din fructe; Ierburi; Minerale; Extracte de ciuperci; Ingrediente naturale; Acizi grași Omega; Organice; Pe bază de plante; Probiotice; Proteine; Sintetice; Extracte vegetale; Vitamine; Altele
hu: Összetevő kategóriája: Aminosavak; Állati eredetű; Antioxidánsok; Mesterséges összetevők; Növényi; Tejalapú; Enzimek; Zsírsavak; Rost; Gyümölcskivonatok; Gyógynövények; Ásványi anyagok; Gombakivonatok; Természetes összetevők; Omega-zsírsavak; Szerves; Növényi alapú; Probiotikumok; Fehérje; Szintetikus; Növényi kivonatok; Vitaminok; Egyéb
pt-PT: Categoria dos ingredientes: Aminoácidos; De origem animal; Antioxidantes; Ingredientes artificiais; Botânico; À base de laticínios; Enzimas; Ácidos gordos; Fibra; Extratos de fruta; Ervas aromáticas; Minerais; Extratos de cogumelos; Ingredientes naturais; Ácidos gordos ómega; Orgânico; À base de plantas; Probióticos; Proteína; Sintético; Extratos vegetais; Vitaminas; Outro
de: Betandteilkategorie: Aminosäuren; Aus Tieren gewonnen; Antioxidantien; Künstliche Inhaltsstoffe; Botanik; Auf Milchbasis; Enzyme; Fettsäuren; Faser; Fruchtextrakte; Kräuter; Minerale; Pilzextrakte; Natürliche Inhaltsstoffe; Omega-Fettsäuren; Bio; Auf pflanzlicher Basis; Probiotika; Protein; Synthetisch; Pflanzenextrakte; Vitamine; Sonstiges
ja: 原材料カテゴリー: アミノ酸; 動物由来; 酸化防止剤; 人工成分; 植物; 乳製品由来; 酵素; 脂肪酸; 繊維; 果実エキス; ハーブ; ミネラル; キノコエキス; 天然成分; オメガ脂肪酸; オーガニック; 植物由来; プロバイオティクス; プロテイン; 合成品; 野菜エキス; ビタミン; その他
sl-SI: Kategorija sestavine: Aminokisline; Živalskega izvora; Antioksidanti; Umetne sestavine; Botanični izdelki; Na osnovi mleka; Encimi; Maščobne kisline; Vlaknine; Sadni izvlečki; Zelišča; Minerali; Izvlečki gob; Naravne sestavine; Omega maščobne kisline; Organsko; Na rastlinski osnovi; Probiotiki; Beljakovine; Sintetika; Zelenjavni izvlečki; Vitamini; Drugo
bg-BG: Категория на съставките: Аминокиселини; Животински произход; Антиоксиданти; Изкуствени съставки; Ботанически; Млечни продукти; Ензими; Мастни киселини; Фибри; Плодови екстракти; Билки; Минерали; Екстракти от гъби; Естествени съставки; Омега мастни киселини; Органични; Растителна основа; Пробиотици; Протеин; Синтетичен; Зеленчукови екстракти; Витамини; Други
da: Ingredienskategori: Aminosyrer; Dyreafledt; Antioxidanter; Kunstige ingredienser; Botaniske stoffer; Mejeri-baseret; Enzymer; Fedtsyrer; Fiber; Frugtekstrakter; Urter; Mineraler; Svampeekstrakter; Naturlige ingredienser; Omega-fedtsyrer; Økologisk; Plantebaseret; Probiotika; Protein; Syntetisk; Grøntsagsekstrakter; Vitaminer; Andet
hr-HR: Kategorija sastojaka: Aminokiseline; Životinjskog podrijetla; Antioksidansi; Umjetni sastojci; Biljni sastojci; Na bazi mliječnih proizvoda; Enzimi; Masne kiseline; Vlakna; Voćni ekstrakti; Bilje; Minerali; Ekstrakti gljiva; Prirodni sastojci; Omega masne kiseline; Organsko; Na biljnoj bazi; Probiotici; Bjelančevine; Sintetika; Ekstrakti povrća; Vitamini; Ostalo
th: หมวดหมู่ส่วนผสม: กรดอะมิโน; ได้จากสัตว์; สารต้านอนุมูลอิสระ; วัตถุดิบสังเคราะห์; ได้จากพืช; ผลิตภัณฑ์จากนม; เอนไซม์; กรดไขมัน; ไฟเบอร์; สารสกัดจากผลไม้; สมุนไพร; เกลือแร่; สารสกัดจากเห็ด; มีส่วนประกอบจากธรรมชาติ; กรดไขมันโอเมก้า; ออร์แกนิก; เนื้อทำจากพืช; โพรไบโอติก; โปรตีน; สังเคราะห์; สารสกัดจากผัก; วิตามิน; อื่นๆ
el: Κατηγορία συστατικών: Αμινοξέα; Ζωικής προέλευσης; Αντιοξειδωτικά; Τεχνητά συστατικά; Φυτικά προϊόντα; Με βάση τα γαλακτοκομικά; Ένζυμα; Λιπαρά οξέα; Φυτικές ίνες; Εκχυλίσματα φρούτων; Βότανα; Μέταλλα; Εκχυλίσματα μανιταριών; Φυσικά συστατικά; Ωμέγα λιπαρά οξέα; Βιολογική; Φυτικής προέλευσης; Προβιοτικά; Πρωτεΐνη; Συνθετικό; Εκχυλίσματα λαχανικών; Βιταμίνες; Άλλο
nl: Ingrediëntcategorie: Aminozuren; Dierlijk; Antioxidanten; Kunstmatige ingrediënten; Plantaardig; Op zuivelbasis; Enzymen; Vetzuren; Vezel; Fruitextracten; Kruiden; Mineralen; Paddestoelextracten; Natuurlijke ingrediënten; Omega-vetzuren; Biologisch; Plantaardig; Probiotica; Eiwit; Synthetisch; Plantaardige extracten; Vitaminen; Andere
pl: Kategoria składnika: Aminokwasy; Pochodzenie zwierzęce; Przeciwutleniacze; Sztuczne składniki; Ziołolecznictwo; Na bazie nabiału; Enzymy; Kwasy tłuszczowe; Włókna; Wyciągi owocowe; Zioła; Minerały; Ekstrakty grzybowe; Naturalne składniki; Kwasy tłuszczowe omega; Organiczna; Roślinny; Probiotyki; Białko; Syntetyczne; Ekstrakty warzywne; Witaminy; Pozostałe
it: Categoria degli ingredienti: Aminoacidi; Di derivazione animale; Antiossidanti; Ingredienti artificiali; Vegetale; A base di latticini; Enzimi; Acidi grassi; Fibra; Estratti di frutta; Erbe aromatiche; Minerali; Estratti di funghi; Ingredienti naturali; Acidi grassi Omega; Biologico; A base vegetale; Probiotici; Proteine; Sintetico; Estratti vegetali; Vitamine; Altro
pt-BR: Categoria de ingrediente: Aminoácidos; De origem animal; Antioxidantes; Ingredientes artificiais; Botânicos; À base de laticínios; Enzimas; Ácidos graxos; Fibra; Extratos de frutas; Ervas; Minerais; Extratos de cogumelos; Ingredientes naturais; Ácidos graxos ômega; Orgânico; À base de plantas; Probióticos; Proteína; Sintético; Extratos vegetais; Vitaminas; Outro
zh-CN: 成分类别: 氨基酸; 动物源性; 抗氧化剂; 人工成分; 植物药; 乳基; 酶; 脂肪酸; 纤维; 水果提取物; 草本植物; 矿石; 蘑菇提取物; 天然成分; 欧米伽脂肪酸; 有机; 植物肉; 益生菌; 蛋白质; 合成; 蔬菜提取物; 维生素; 其他
sv: Ingredienskategori: Aminosyror; Animaliskt ursprung; Antioxidanter; Konstgjorda ingredienser; Växter; Mjölkbaserat; Enzymer; Fettsyror; Fiber; Fruktextrakt; Örter; Mineraler; Svampextrakt; Naturliga ingredienser; Omegafettsyror; Organisk; Växtbaserad; Probiotika; Protein; Syntetisk; Grönsaksextrakt; Vitaminer; Annat
fi: Ainesosaluokka: Aminohapot; Eläinperäinen; Antioksidantit; Keinotekoiset ainesosat; Kasviperäiset ainesosat; Maitopohjainen; Entsyymit; Rasvahapot; Kuitu; Hedelmäuutteet; Yrtit; Mineraalit; Sieniuutteet; Luonnolliset ainesosat; Omega-rasvahapot; Luomu; Kasvipohjainen; Probiootit; Proteiini; Synteettinen; Kasviuutteet; Vitamiinit; Muu
ko: 성분 카테고리: 아미노산; 동물 유래; 항산화제; 인공 성분; 식물; 유제품 기반; 효소; 지방산; 섬유; 과일 추출물; 허브; 미네랄; 버섯 추출물; 천연 성분; 오메가 지방산; 유기농; 식물 기반; 프로바이오틱스; 단백질; 인조; 채소 추출물; 비타민; 기타
tr: İçerik Kategorisi: Aminoasitler; Hayvan kaynaklı; Antioksidanlar; Yapay malzemeler; Botanikler; Süt bazlı; Enzimler; Yağ asitleri; Fiber; Meyve özleri; Otlar; Mineraller; Mantar özleri; Doğal içerik; Omega yağ asitleri; Organik; Bitki bazlı; Probiyotikler; Protein; Sentetik; Sebze özleri; Vitaminler; Diğer
fr: Catégorie de l’ingrédient: Acides aminés; D’origine animale; Antioxydants; Ingrédients artificiels; Botaniques; À base de produits laitiers; Enzymes; Acides gras; Fibre; Extraits de fruits; Herbes; Minéraux; Extraits de champignons; Ingrédients naturels; Acides gras oméga; Bio; À base de plantes; Probiotiques; Protéine; Synthétique; Extraits végétaux; Vitamines; Autre
zh-TW: 成分類別: 胺基酸; 動物源成分; 抗氧化劑; 人工成分; 植物性; 乳製品成分; 酵素; 脂肪酸; 纖維; 水果萃取物; 藥草; 礦物; 蘑菇萃取物; 天然成分; Omega 脂肪酸; 有機; 植物性; 益生菌; 蛋白質; 合成; 蔬菜萃取物; 維生素; 其他
lt-LT: Ingrediento kategorija: Amino rūgštys; Gyvulinės kilmės; Antioksidantai; Dirbtinės kilmės ingredientai; Botaniniai ingredientai; Pieno pagrindas; Fermentai; Riebalų rūgštys; Skaidulos; Vaisių ekstraktai; Vaistažolės; Mineralai; Grybų ekstraktai; Natūralūs ingredientai; Omega riebalų rūgštys; Ekologiška; Augalinės kilmės; Probiotikai; Baltymai; Sintetika; Daržovių ekstraktai; Vitaminai; Kita
sk-SK: Kategória zložky: Aminokyseliny; Zo zvierat; Antioxidanty; Umelé prísady; Botanické látky; Na báze mlieka; Enzýmy; Mastné kyseliny; Vláknina; Výťažky z ovocia; Bylinky; Minerály; Výťažky z húb; Prírodné zložky; Omega mastné kyseliny; Organický; Na rastlinnej báze; Probiotiká; Bielkovinový; Syntetický; Rastlinné extrakty; Vitamíny; Iné
ru: Категории ингредиентов: Аминокислоты; Животного происхождения; Антиоксиданты; Искусственные ингредиенты; Растительные; На основе молочных продуктов; Ферменты; Жирные кислоты; Клетчатка; Фруктовые экстракты; Травы; Минералы; Экстракты грибов; Натуральные ингредиенты; Омега-3 жирные кислоты; Органические; На растительной основе; Пробиотики; Белок; Синтетические; Экстракт из овощей; Витамины; Другие